Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.100

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of licenses, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1997 c 285 s 11.]